Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 1 Rules of Descent

33-1-1.
Real estate descending by intestacy to children or descendants, parents, or brothers and sisters.

Whenever any person having title to any real estate of inheritance shall die intestate as to such estate, it shall descend and pass in equal portions to his or her kindred, in the following course:

First to the intestate’s children or their descendants, if there are any.

Second, if there be no children nor their descendants, then to the intestate’s parents in equal shares, or to the surviving parent.

Third, if there is no parent, then to the intestate’s brothers and sisters, and their descendants.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 933; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1913, ch. 924, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1283, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-1

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-2.
Descent of real estate to paternal or maternal kindred.

If the intestate has no surviving parent, nor brother, nor sister, nor their descendants, the inheritance shall go in equal moieties to the intestate’s paternal and maternal kindred, each in the following course:

First to the grandparents, in equal shares, if any there be.

Second, if there be no grandparent, then to the uncles and aunts, or their descendants by representation, or such of them as there be.

Third, if there be no grandparent, nor uncle, nor aunt, nor their descendants, then to the great grandparents in equal shares, if any there be.

Fourth, if there be no great grandparent, then to the great uncles and great aunts or their descendants by representation, or such of them as there be; and so on, in other cases, without end, passing to the nearest lineal ancestors and their descendants or such of them as there be.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 934; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 924, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-2

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-3.
Descent when no paternal or maternal kindred survive.

When in this chapter the inheritance is directed to go by moieties to the intestate’s paternal and maternal kindred, if there are no such kindred on the one part, the whole shall go to the other part; and if there are no kindred either on the one part or the other the whole shall go to the intestate’s surviving spouse or if the spouse did not survive the intestate, it shall go to the spouse’s kindred in the like course as if he or she had survived the intestate and then died entitled to the estate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 936; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 4; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 4; P.L. 1944, ch. 1421, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-3

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

Parties to Proceedings.

Town treasurer had no right to intervene in proceeding on administrator’s report to contest the right of one claiming under this section. Dailey v. Connery,

75 R.I. 274

, 65 A.2d 801,

1949 R.I. LEXIS 43

(1949).

New parties seeking admission as interested parties to probate appeal on the ground that they are heirs are not required to prove intestacy as a condition precedent to admission. Spooner v. Tucker,

78 R.I. 329

, 82 A.2d 162,

1951 R.I. LEXIS 81

(1951).

In an appeal by a brother of the predeceased husband of decedent from a probate court order admitting decedent’s alleged last will and testament to probate on proponent’s petition for probate alleging that there were no known relatives or heirs, the contestant was properly before the court without evidence that decedent died without heirs or next of kin. Apollonio v. Kenyon,

101 R.I. 578

, 225 A.2d 778,

1967 R.I. LEXIS 803

(1967).

33-1-4.
Descent to persons not in being or not capable to take as heirs.

No right in the inheritance shall accrue to any persons whatsoever other than to the children of the intestate, unless such persons are in being and capable in law to take as heirs at the time of the intestate’s death.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 935; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-4

.

33-1-5.
Life estate descending to spouse.

Whenever the intestate dies and leaves a surviving spouse, the real estate of the intestate shall descend and pass to the surviving spouse for his or her natural life. The provisions of §§

33-1-1

and

33-1-2

shall be subject to the provisions of this section and §

33-1-6

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 316, § 4, as enacted by P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 4; P.L. 1944, ch. 1421, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-5

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-6.
Widow’s or husband’s allowance of real estate in fee.

The probate court having jurisdiction of the estate of the intestate, if a resident of this state, or the probate court of any city or town in which the real estate of the intestate is situated if not a resident of this state, may also, in its discretion, upon petition filed within six (6) months from the date of the first publication of notice of the qualification of the administrator of the estate of the intestate, allow and set off to the intestate’s surviving spouse in fee real estate of the intestate situated in this state to an amount not exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in value, over and above all incumbrances, if not required for the payment of the debts of the intestate; provided that if the real estate shall be in a single parcel of greater value over and above incumbrances than one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) and shall be deemed by the court, because of such condition and value, to be incapable of being allowed and set off hereunder, either as a whole or by partition, without unreasonable diminution in the value thereof, the court may order the parcel to be sold by the administrator, the administrator giving bond as in other cases of the sale of real estate, and from the proceeds of such sale may allow and set off the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) to the intestate’s surviving spouse for his or her own use and any surplus of the proceeds of sale shall be deemed to be real estate for the purposes of descent and distribution; provided, however, that title to real estate situated in any town or city of this state shall not pass by the decree of the probate court setting off and allowing such real estate, for the purpose of conveyance by the intestate’s surviving spouse until a copy of such decree as entered, duly certified by the probate clerk, is recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city where the land is situated. The allowance and set off under this section shall be in addition to the life estate pursuant to §

33-1-5

.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 316, § 4, as enacted by P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 4; P.L. 1944, ch. 1421, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 155, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-7.
Descendants of deceased heirs.

The descendants of any person deceased shall inherit the real and personal estate that the person would have inherited had the person survived the intestate, subject to the express provisions of these canons of descent and distribution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 937; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-7

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-8.
Children born out of wedlock.

A child born out of wedlock shall be capable of inheriting or transmitting inheritance on the part of his or her mother and father in like manner as if born in lawful wedlock. Any such child whose parents shall lawfully intermarry and shall acknowledge him or her as their child shall be deemed legitimate.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 939; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 7; P.L. 1926, ch. 855, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-8

; P.L. 1986, ch. 194, § 1.

33-1-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 940; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 8; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 323, § 21, effective July 5, 1995.

33-1-10.
Surplus personalty not bequeathed.

The surplus of any chattels or personal estate of a deceased person, not bequeathed, after the payment of his or her just debts, funeral charges, and expenses of settling his or her estate, shall be distributed by order of the probate court which shall grant administration in the manner following:

The sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) from the surplus and one-half (1/2) of the remainder to the widow or surviving husband forever, if the intestate died without issue.

One-half (1/2) of the surplus to the widow or surviving husband forever, if the intestate died leaving issue.

The residue shall be distributed among the heirs of the intestate in the same manner real estates descend and pass by this chapter, but without having any respect to the life estate and discretionary allowance provided by §§

33-1-5

and

33-1-6

.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 941; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 9; P.L. 1919, ch. 1787, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 9; P.L. 1943, ch. 1283, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-10

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 155, § 2.

33-1-11.
Advancements and debts of decedent.

If a person dies intestate as to all or a portion of the decedent’s estate, any property given by the decedent during his or her lifetime to an individual who, at decedent’s death, is an heir, shall be treated as an advancement against the heir’s intestate share only if:

The decedent declared in a contemporaneous writing, or the heir acknowledged in writing, that the gift is an advancement; or

The decedent’s contemporaneous writing, or the heir’s written acknowledgment, otherwise indicates that the gift is to be taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent’s intestate estate.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, property advanced is valued as of the time the heir came into possession or enjoyment of the property or as of the time of the decedent’s death, whichever first occurs.

If the recipient of the property fails to survive the decedent, the property is not taken into account in computing the division and distribution of the decedent’s intestate estate, unless the decedent’s contemporaneous writing provides otherwise.

A debt owed to decedent is not charged against the intestate share of any individual except the debtor. If the debtor fails to survive the decedent, the debt is not taken into account in computing the intestate share of the debtor’s descendants.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 955; G.L. 1909, ch. 316, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 367, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 567, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-1-11

; P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 1.

33-1-12.
Intestate estate.

Any part of a decedent’s estate not effectively disposed of by will passes by intestate succession to the decedent’s heirs as prescribed in this chapter, except as modified by the decedent’s will.

A decedent may by will expressly exclude or limit the right of an individual or class to succeed to property of the decedent passing by intestate succession. If that individual, or a member of that class, survives the decedent, the share of the decedent’s intestate estate to which that individual or class would have succeeded passes as if that individual or each member of that class has disclaimed an intestate share.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 3.

33-1-13.
Survivorship.

An individual who fails to survive the decedent by one hundred twenty (120) hours is considered to have predeceased the decedent for purposes of homestead allowance, exempt property, and intestate succession, and the decedent’s heirs are determined accordingly. If it is not established by clear and convincing evidence that an individual, who would otherwise be an heir, survived the decedent by one hundred twenty (120) hours, it is considered that the individual failed to survive for the required period. This section is not to be applied if its application would result in escheat of intestate estate to the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 3.